Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201466-912.02
Interest in wind or solar resource;
restriction on severance from surface estate.

No interest in any wind or solar resource
located on a tract of land and associated with the production or potential
production of wind or solar energy on the tract of land may be severed from
the surface estate.

Laws 2012, LB828, § 10.